Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.250

Dissolution.

The members of any association may by the vote of two-thirds of the members voting thereon, at any regular meeting or at any special meeting called for that purpose, vote to dissolve said association after notice of the proposed dissolution has been given to all members entitled to vote thereon, in the manner provided by the bylaws, and thereupon such proceeding shall be had for the dissolution of said association as is provided by law for the dissolution of corporations organized under chapter 24.06 RCW: PROVIDED, That if the total vote upon the proposed dissolution shall be less than twenty-five percent of the total membership of the association, the dissolution shall not be approved. At the meeting, members may vote upon the proposed dissolution in person, or by written proxy, or by mailed ballot.

[ 1981 c 297 s 36.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.